Utah statutes.
53-7-221.   Exceptions from Utah Fireworks Act.
(1)  Sections 53-7-220 through 53-7-225 do not apply to class A, class B, and
class C explosives that are not for use in Utah, but are manufactured, stored,
warehoused, or in transit for destinations outside of Utah.
(2)  Sections 53-7-220 through 53-7-225 do not supersede Section 23-13-7,
regarding use of fireworks and explosives by the Division of Wildlife
Resources and federal game agents.
